Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3307.01
Health care therapy, defined.

Health care
therapy means health care activities that require the exercise of judgment
for which licensure is required under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2009, LB463, § 4.